Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-708
Appointment of guardian ad litem or visitor.

At any point in a proceeding under sections 30-701 to 30-713, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem or a visitor.

Laws 2018, LB845, § 8.